apertium-pus.pus.dix
   <!-- M3 nouns animated and inanimated -->
    <pardef n="سړ__n">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- M4 nouns animated-->
    <pardef n="بازو__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ګان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ګانو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ګانو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ګانو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


 <!-- Feminine nouns -->
<!-- F1 nouns -->
    <pardef n="ښځ__n">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- F1 nouns ending in consonant -->
     <pardef n="ورځ__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<!-- Irregular nouns-->
   <pardef n="غر__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۀ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ونه</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ونو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ونو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ونو</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<!-- Numerals -->
<pardef n="نه__num">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Preposition -->
<pardef n="په__pr">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Postposition -->
<pardef n="ته__post">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Conjunctions -->
<pardef n="او__cnjcoo">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Verbs -->
<!-- present imperfective paradigm-->
  <pardef n="common_endings">
    <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ﺉ</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="presimp_endings">
    <e><par n="common_endings"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- past imperfective paradigm-->
 <pardef n="pastimp_endings">
    <e><par n="common_endings"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ۀ</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ې</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- verb stem present-->
<pardef n="ګډېد__vblex" c="present">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="presimp_endings"/></e>
</pardef>
<!-- verb stem past imperfective -->
<!-- verb stem present-->
<pardef n="ګډېدل__vblex" c="past">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="pastimp_endings"/></e>
</pardef>
<!-- to be -->
<pardef n="يم__vbser">

      <e>       <p><l>يم</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>يو</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>يې</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>يئ</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>دی</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ده</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>دي</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وم</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وو</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وې</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وئ</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤ</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وه</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وو</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وې</l><r>يم<s n="vbser"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>
<!-- sample verb -->
<pardef n="ګډېد/ل__vblex">

      <e>       <p><l>م</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ې</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئ</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ي</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ي</l><r>ل<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="/زه__prn">
      <e><p><l>زه</l><r>زه<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ما</l><r>زه<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ته__prn">
      <e><p><l>ته</l><r>ته<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تا</l><r>ته<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="زه"><i></i><par n="/زه__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ته"><i></i><par n="/ته__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="سړی"><i>سړی</i><par n="سړ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بازو"><i>بازو</i><par n="بازو__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ښځه"><i>ښځه</i><par n="ښځ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ورځ"><i>ورځ</i><par n="ورځ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غر"><i>غر</i><par n="غر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="په"><i>په</i><par n="په__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="له"><i>له</i><par n="په__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="تر"><i>تر</i><par n="په__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="د"><i>د</i><par n="په__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ته"><i>ته</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="سره"><i>سره</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="دپاره"><i>دپاره</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="لپاره"><i>لپاره</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="پسې"><i>پسې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="کښې"><i>کښې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="کې"><i>کې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="لاندې"><i>لاندې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="پورې"><i>پورې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="باندې"><i>باندې</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="څخه"><i>څخه</i><par n="ته__post"/></e>
    <e lm="او"><i>او</i><par n="او__cnjcoo"/></e>
   <e lm="اتلس"><i>اتلس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="اته"><i>اته</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="اتيا"><i>اتيا</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="اوولس"><i>اوولس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="اووه"><i>اووه</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="اويا"><i>اويا</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="درې"><i>درې</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="دوه"><i>دوه</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="دوولس"><i>دوولس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="ديارلس"><i>ديارلس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="دېرش"><i>دېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="زر"><i>زر</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="سل"><i>سل</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="شل"><i>شل</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="شپاړس"><i>شپاړس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="شپږ"><i>شپږ</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="شپېته"><i>شپېته</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="لس"><i>لس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="ميليون"><i>ميليون</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="نشت"><i>نشت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="نولس"><i>نولس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="نوي"><i>نوي</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="يو"><i>يو</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="يوولس"><i>يوولس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="پنځلس"><i>پنځلس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="پنځه"><i>پنځه</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="پنځوس"><i>پنځوس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
   <e lm="څلور"><i>څلور</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یو"><i>یو</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوولس"><i>یوولس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دیرلس"><i>دیرلس</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوویشت"><i>یوویشت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="درویشت"><i>درویشت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="څلېرویشت"><i>څلېرویشت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="شپږویشت"><i>شپږویشت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یودېرش"><i>یودېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دودېرش"><i>دودېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دریدېرش"><i>دریدېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="څلوردېرش"><i>څلوردېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="شپوږدېرش"><i>شپوږدېرش</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="څلوېښت"><i>څلوېښت</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اویا"><i>اویا</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اتیا"><i>اتیا</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوسلویو"><i>یوسلویو</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوسلودوه"><i>یوسلودوه</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوسلوشل"><i>یوسلوشل</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یوزرویو"><i>یوزرویو</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="لک"><i>لک</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ملیون"><i>ملیون</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ملیارد"><i>ملیارد</i><par n="نه__num"/></e>
<e lm="يم"><i></i><par n="يم__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="ګډېدل"><i>ګډېدل</i><par n="ګډېدل__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ګډېدل"><i>ګډېد</i><par n="ګډېد__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="کول"><i>کول</i><par n="ګډېدل__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="کول"><i>کو</i><par n="ګډېد__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="لیکل"><i>لیکل</i><par n="ګډېدل__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="لیکل"><i>لیک</i><par n="ګډېد__vblex"/></e>
